02_Morphology/noun_forms.lexc
LEXICON Root
Nouns;

LEXICON Nouns
S;
ES;
VES;
I;
Other;

LEXICON S
cat%<n%>%<pl%> : cats #;
dog%<n%>%<pl%> : dogs #;
team%<n%>%<pl%> : teams #;
house%<n%>%<pl%> : houses #;
place%<n%>%<pl%> : places #;
roof%<n%>%<pl%> : roofs #;
belief%<n%>%<pl%> : beliefs #;
chef%<n%>%<pl%> : chefs #;


LEXICON ES
fox%<n%>%<pl%> : foxes #;
class%<n%>%<pl%> : classes #;
lunch%<n%>%<pl%> : lunches #;
tax%<n%>%<pl%> : taxes #;
bus%<n%>%<pl%> : buses #;

LEXICON VES 
wife%<n%>%<pl%> : wives #;
wolf%<n%>%<pl%> : wolves #;


LEXICON I
cactus%<n%>%<pl%> : cacti #;
focus%<n%>%<pl%> : foci #;

LEXICON Other
mouse%<n%>%<pl%> : mice #;
goose%<n%>%<pl%> : geese #;
foot%<n%>%<pl%> : feet #;
